Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,172
Completion of setoff; notice.

When the Department of Health and Human Services receives all or a portion of a certified debt pursuant to section 77-27,171, the department shall notify the debtor of the completion of the setoff. Such notice shall include the final amount of the refund or state lottery prize to which the debtor was entitled prior to the setoff, the amount of the certified debt, and the amount of the refund or state lottery prize in excess of the debt, if any.

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 18;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 78;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 808;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 209.